Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2002.01
Officers appointed to carrier enforcement division; status and training.

On and after July 20, 2002, officers of the Nebraska State Patrol appointed to the carrier enforcement division shall be officers of the Nebraska State Patrol with the powers and duties as prescribed in sections 81-2001 to 81-2009 and this section and shall receive training commensurate with such powers and duties prior to appointment to the carrier enforcement division.

Laws 2002, LB 470, § 3.